Utah statutes.
9-4-918.   Corporation property, notes, and bonds -- Tax exemption except corporate franchise tax.

All property acquired or held by the corporation under this part is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes, and all the property, its income, and notes and bonds issued under this part, the interest payable on the notes and bonds, and income derived from the notes and bonds, shall at all times be exempt from all taxation of every kind and nature whatsoever imposed by the state, any county, any municipality, or any other political subdivision of the state, except for the corporate franchise tax.

